Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter the secretary or his or her
duly authorized representative may administer oaths and affirmations, take
depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of
witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other
records considered necessary and relevant as evidence in connection with the
administration of the cabinet. The subpoenas[Such subpoena] shall be served in the
same manner as a subpoena issued out of a Circuit Court.
(2) No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda or other records in response to such subpoena
on the grounds that the evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or
subject him to a penalty, or forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or subjected to
any suit, penalty, or forfeiture on account of any transaction, matter, or thing
concerning which he or she or his or her agent or worker is compelled, after having
claimed privilege against self-incrimination, to give evidence except that the[such]
witness so testifying shall not be exempt from punishment for perjury.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/24/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed